Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Article 1. In General

Providing access to national forest. —

It was not improper for the court to permit a county, which condemned a privately owned road to provide access to a national forest, to proceed under the Eminent Domain Act (§§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

) instead of the provisions of this article. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges §§ 21 to 181; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 271 to 276.

26 C.J.S. Dedication §§ 8,9; 39A C.J.S. Highways §§ 37 to 160; 84 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 291 to 294.

§ 24-3-101.
Resolution by county commissioners; petition of county electors; alteration authority specified.

The board of county commissioners of any county, may, on its own motion by resolution duly adopted, where it deems the public interest so requires, initiate the procedure for the establishment, vacation or alteration of a county highway, as the case may be, by setting forth in such resolution the point of commencement, the course and the point of termination of said road to be established, altered or vacated, as the case may be, and thereafter following out the provisions of article 2, chapter 52, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, not inconsistent therewith. If the motion specifies vacation of a county road, alley or highway located within one and one half (1 1/2) miles of the boundary of a city or town, the board shall notify the governing body of the city or town.

Any person desiring the establishment, vacation or alteration of a county highway shall file in the office of the county clerk of the proper county, a petition signed by five (5) or more electors of the county residing within twenty-five (25) miles of the road proposed to be established, altered, or vacated, in substance as follows: To the Board of County Commissioners of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . County. The undersigned ask that a county highway, commencing at . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and running thence . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and terminating at . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . be established (altered or vacated as the case may be).
(b) (i) Any person desiring the establishment, vacation or alteration of a county highway shall file in the office of the county clerk of the proper county, a petition signed by five (5) or more electors of the county residing within twenty-five (25) miles of the road proposed to be established, altered, or vacated, in substance as follows: To the Board of County Commissioners of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . County. The undersigned ask that a county highway, commencing at . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and running thence . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and terminating at . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . be established (altered or vacated as the case may be).

In altering any county highway under this article or any other road dedicated by recorded plat as a public road, a board of county commissioners may change the designation of any road to a private road. If a board alters any road, it shall reserve the access rights of the area landowners and permit governmental agencies to retain access to that road for performing essential public services. It may also designate a nongovernmental entity to be responsible for the maintenance of any road altered pursuant to this section.

(ii)

With said petition shall be filed a list containing the names and also the known post office address of each person owning or having an interest in any land over which the proposed establishment, vacation or alteration of a county highway is to be made.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1909; Laws 1913, ch. 73, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 2988; R.S. 1931, § 52-207; Laws 1937, ch. 139, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 48-307; W.S. 1957, § 24-43; Laws 1985, ch. 83, § 1; 1994, ch. 62, § 1; 2005, ch. 164, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Article 2, ch. 52, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931, referred to in subsection (a), appears herein as §§

24-1-101

through

24-1-105

,

24-1-121

through

24-1-123

,

24-3-101

through

24-3-121

,

24-3-123

through

24-3-125

and

24-9-101

through

24-9-104

.

Chapter not applicable to cities and towns. —

This and following sections are not the statutory provisions to be followed by a city or town in condemnation proceedings. The only section which is applicable is §

1-26-101

(now repealed; see §

1-26-501

). Newcastle v. Toomey, 78 Wyo. 432, 329 P.2d 264,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1958).

Section authorizes board to alter or vacate impractical highway.—

If the board considers a highway impractical or without benefit to the public, this section is clear authority for alteration or vacation. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

But agreement to vacate otherwise than by statute providedis void. —

Agreements by board of county commissioners to vacate an established county road by methods other than those by statute provided were null and void. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

County necessary party. —

District court correctly concluded that the issue of whether county had followed the proper procedures for vacating road was not properly before it, because county had not been joined as a party to lawsuit in which plaintiff sought to establish her right-of-way after county vacated its easement. Schott v. Miller, 943 P.2d 1174,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1997).

Section

24-3-110

was included in art. 2, ch. 52 of the 1931 Revised Statutes

mentioned in this section, and is the principal procedural statute contained therein. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Nature of proceeding. —

Proceeding for establishment of a public road and the taking of land therefor is a special proceeding. Gillespie v. Board of Comm'rs, 47 Wyo. 1, 30 P.2d 797,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1934), limited, Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Petition need not state qualifications of petitioners. —

Petition for establishment of public road in absence of statutory requirement need not state qualifications of petitioners. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

But petition not signed by required number ineffective. —

Proceedings to establish road would be void if petition therefor clearly showed that it was not signed by the number required by this section. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Incomplete list of property owners is not jurisdictional defect.—

That list of property owners filed with petition to establish public road is not complete is not a jurisdictional defect as to a person named. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Signed waiver of damages as sufficient petition. —

On collateral attack of proceedings to establish road, a so-called waiver of damages for taking land for road could alone properly be considered sufficient petition under this section, for establishing, it having enough signers, describing the proposed road, and it being inferable from its statements that the signers were asking the board to establish the road. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Findings sustained. —

Finding of two papers being fastened together and circulated as petition for establishment was sustained. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Special rights granted to individuals extinguished. —

Since the legislature provided that all title and interest to the vacated portion of a county road reverts to the adjacent landowner subject to only a few designated exceptions, any other special rights-of-way, licenses, or privileges which a county has granted to individuals are extinguished upon vacation of the road and relinquishment of the public's interest. Schott v. Miller, 943 P.2d 1174,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1954).

Stated

in

Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1950).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Compensation for Condemnation: Recent Wyoming Development,” see 17 Wyo. L.J. 246 (1963).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of regulations as to subdivision map or plat upon vacation of streets and highways, 11 ALR2d 524.

Effect of vacation of highway before conveyance on question whether description with reference to highway carries title to center or side of highway, 49 ALR2d 982.

§ 24-3-102.
Requiring deposit by petitioners.

The board of the county commissioners may require, in their discretion, that the petitioners for the establishment, alteration or vacation of a public road, shall deposit with the county clerk, a sufficient sum of money to defray the expenses of laying out, vacating or altering such road, and such expense, when so incurred, shall be paid out of such deposit. If the road is finally established, altered or vacated, the money so deposited shall be returned to the person who deposited the same.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 1910; C.S. 1910, § 2517; C.S. 1920, § 2989; R.S. 1931, § 52-208; C.S. 1945, § 48-308; W.S. 1957, § 24-44.

§ 24-3-103.
Viewer; appointment, qualifications and duties generally.

Upon filing of the petition the board of the county commissioners at a regular or special meeting, or the chairman of the board, if in his judgment an emergency exists, shall appoint a suitable and disinterested person, who may be a member of the board of county commissioners, to examine into the expediency of the proposed road, alteration or vacation thereof, and to report immediately.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 1911; C.S. 1910, § 2518; C.S. 1920, § 2990; R.S. 1931, § 52-209; C.S. 1945, § 48-309; W.S. 1957, § 24-45; Laws 1985, ch. 83, § 1.

Appointment of viewer without showing of emergency. —

Appointment of road viewer by chairman of the board of county commissioners, without a showing of emergency, is not a jurisdictional defect. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Applied

in

Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1954).

§ 24-3-104.
Viewer; oath; scope of investigation.

The person so appointed shall be termed a viewer, and he shall be sworn by some person or officer authorized by law to administer oaths, before entering upon his duties, to faithfully and impartially discharge his duties, and he shall file his oath in the office of the county clerk. He shall not be confined to the precise matter of the petition, but may inquire or determine whether that, or any road, in the vicinity of the proposed or altered road, answering the same purpose is required.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 1912; C.S. 1910, § 2519; C.S. 1920, § 2991; R.S. 1931, § 52-210; C.S. 1945, § 48-310; W.S. 1957, § 24-46.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

§ 24-3-105.
Viewer; factors to be considered.

In forming his judgment the viewer shall take into consideration both the public and private convenience, and also the expense of the proposed road.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 1913; C.S. 1910, § 2520; C.S. 1920, § 2992; R.S. 1931, § 52-211; C.S. 1945, § 48-311; W.S. 1957, § 24-47.

§ 24-3-106.
Viewer; report.

The said viewer shall report in writing to the board of the county commissioners, whether or not in his judgment, said proposed road is practicable, and ought or ought not be established, altered or vacated, as the case may be, stating the probable expense of the same, including damages to the property owners along the line thereof, the benefits thereto, and such other matters therein as shall enable the said board to act understandingly in the premises.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 1914; C.S. 1910, § 2521; C.S. 1920, § 2993; R.S. 1931, § 52-212; C.S. 1945, § 48-312; W.S. 1957, § 24-48.

Failure to itemize damages. —

Any defect of viewer's report in not itemizing damages and benefits is not jurisdictional. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Report of viewer held sufficient

to show his opinion that proposed road was practicable. — See North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

§ 24-3-107.
Viewer; compensation.

The board of the county commissioners shall allow the said viewer such reasonable compensation for his services as they shall determine and fix upon.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 1915; C.S. 1910, § 2522; C.S. 1920, § 2994; R.S. 1931, § 52-213; C.S. 1945, § 48-313; W.S. 1957, § 24-49.

§ 24-3-108.
Roads established by consent of landowners.

Public roads shall be established without the appointment of a viewer, or without any other proceeding, than the order of the board of county commissioners; provided, that the written consent of all the owners of the land to be used for that purpose, be first filed in the office of the county clerk, and when it is shown to the satisfaction of the said board that the said road is of sufficient importance to be opened and traveled, they shall make an order establishing the same. The board of the county commissioners, when in their judgment such action shall be in the interests of economy or the public good, may purchase or receive donations or rights-of-way for a public road, or any alteration thereof, or any part thereof, from any and all persons along the route thereof, and declare the same opened, whenever the consent of the owners of the land through which said proposed road or alteration shall run, has been obtained, either by the donations of land or when an amicable adjustment of the amount to be paid therefor has been made between such landowners and said board; and all roads or parts of roads or alteration of roads heretofore opened or made, by consent or adjustment of damages, without recourse to other proceedings, are hereby declared to be public roads, the same as if such roads had been legally opened, or said alterations legally made.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 1928; C.S. 1910, § 2535; C.S. 1920, § 307; R.S. 1931, § 52-226; C.S. 1945, § 48-326; W.S. 1957, § 24-50.

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

In general. —

Right, if any, acquired by public to use road over vacant, unoccupied land is independent of the legality of proceedings for the location of a road along a section line, or the question whether any such proceedings were had. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Legislative policy. —

Statute directing recordation of all county highways by county commissioners to January 1, 1924, and providing method for their lawful establishment thereafter, indicates policy that roads should be shown on records. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

What is contemplated by statute. —

This section merely contemplates the omission of the appointment of a viewer, appraisers, etc. The road need not be established and is established only if the commissioners in their discretion order it to be established. Nixon v. Edwards, 72 Wyo. 274, 264 P.2d 287,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1953).

Proceedings to create highway to be definite and certain. —

All persons concerned, including those whose property is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land to be occupied by the proposed road, so the proceedings to create a highway should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, with the record before him, point out its location. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

When assumption of control by board of county commissionersrequired. —

In absence of a dedication, express or implied, by owner of land for a public road other than by his silence, there must be, in addition to use of road over unimproved and vacant lands by the public, assumption of control and jurisdiction by the board of county commissioners for period of limitation, as essential claim of public right can only be made by public through its duly constituted authorities. Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1909), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 130, 107 P. 748,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1910).

Consent to establishment of temporary road. —

Landowner's proposal to the board of commissioners that for a term of not to exceed four years or until a certain highway be constructed the county could build a road around flooded portions of the then county road caused by the landowner building a reservoir did not constitute consent to the establishment of a public road over the changed route because of the temporary status of the arrangement. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Maintenance of roads established by consent of landowners.—

Under the language of this section, that the roads established “are hereby declared to be public roads, the same as if such roads had been legally opened,” maintenance thereof by the public authorities would seem to follow so that the section in no way contradicts or modifies statutory provisions regarding establishment of or responsibility for public roads. Nixon v. Edwards, 72 Wyo. 274, 264 P.2d 287,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1953).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923).

§ 24-3-109.
Survey of proposed location for new road; recordation required.

If, upon considering and acting upon the report of the viewer, or otherwise, the board of the county commissioners shall decide to lay out such road, they shall cause the county surveyor to make an accurate survey thereof, if such survey is deemed necessary, and to plat and record the same in the book provided by the county for such purpose; and a copy of said plat and notes of survey shall, without unnecessary delay, be filed in the office of the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 1916; C.S. 1910, § 2523; C.S. 1920, § 2995; R.S. 1931, § 52-214; C.S. 1945, § 48-314; W.S. 1957, § 24-51.

Cross references. —

As to duty of county surveyor to make surveys and to keep plats, see §

18-3-702

.

The policy of the legislature is that roads should be shown on the records.

Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

Statute directing recordation of all county highways by county commissioners to January 1, 1924, and providing method for their lawful establishment thereafter, indicates policy that roads should be shown on records. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Proceedings to create highway should be definite and certain.—

All persons concerned, including those whose property is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land to be occupied by the proposed road, so the proceedings to create a highway should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, with the record before him, point out its location. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

And general directions are not sufficient. —

General directions, contained in the notice and proceedings of commissioners, without points and courses would not permit a surveyor to ascertain from the description where the road was to be placed and would not, therefore, provide an adequate record of location of the road. Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

Identifying land to be taken. —

All persons, including parties whose land is to be taken, are entitled to be informed of the land which the road is to occupy, and the description in the plat should be so definite and certain that a competent surveyor could, based upon the description, determine the road's location. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Before a county can take the necessary land to establish a roadway it must identify it specifically so that the party owning the land may assert his claim for just compensation. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

A method by which proof could be made that a county road was established

would be to show that a copy of the plat and survey notes had been filed in the office of the county clerk. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

Quoted

in

Steplock v. Board of County Comm'rs, 894 P.2d 599,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

, 4 L.R.A. (n.s.) 169 (1905); North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923).

§ 24-3-110.
Notice of location of road to be published or posted; notice by mail to property owners.

Notice shall be published of the proposed location or alteration of any road by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication for two (2) successive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county, which notice may be in the following form:

To all to whom it may concern: The Board of County Commissioners have decided to locate (or alter, as the case may be) a road commencing at in County, Wyoming, running thence (here describe in general terms the points and courses thereof), and terminating at . All objections thereto or claims for damages by reason thereof must be filed in writing with the county clerk of said county, before noon on the day of A.D. or such road will be established (or altered) without reference to such objections or claims for damages. County Clerk Dated A.D.

Click to view

The county commissioners shall cause a copy of the above notice to be mailed by registered mail to all persons owning lands or claiming any interest in any lands over or across which said road is proposed to be located or altered. The publication and posting of such notice shall be a legal and sufficient notice to all persons owning lands or claiming any interest in lands over which the proposed road is to be located or altered.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 1918; C.S. 1910, § 2525; Laws 1913, ch. 73, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 2997; R.S. 1931, § 52-216; C.S. 1945, § 48-316; W.S. 1957, § 24-52; 2014 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices, see §

1-6-201

et seq.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “any road by posting on the county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication for two (2) successive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county, which” for “any road for three (3) successive weeks in three (3) successive issues of some official news paper published in the county, if any such there be, and if no newspaper be published therein, such notice shall be posted in at least three (3) public places along the line of said proposed or altered road, which.”

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

This section was included in art. 2, ch. 52 of the 1931 Revised Statutes

mentioned in §

24-3-101

and is the principal procedural statute contained therein. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Application to altering or vacating roads. —

The supreme court has suggested that the provisions of this section be utilized to alter or vacate such roads. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Although this section itself omits any reference to vacation, any such proposed vacation must proceed with proper notice to those interested, including the traveling public in certain instances. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Agreements by board of county commissioners to vacate an established county road by methods other than those by statute provided were null and void. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 547 P.2d 1195,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1976).

Legislative policy. —

Statute directing recordation of all county highways by county commissioners to January 1, 1924, and providing method for their lawful establishment thereafter, indicates policy that roads should be shown on records. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Due process. —

Requirement of due process is satisfied by the prior notice required by this section to be given by commissioners of the proposed location of road, and because claims for damages and objections must be filed in certain time, it then becoming duty of a claimant for damages to take cognizance of all acts or steps thereafter taken in the proceedings, which are public, and claimant may have review by the commissioners of the allowance by the appraisers, and by the court of decision of the commissioners. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

When provisions mandatory. —

Statutory provisions for establishment of public road are mandatory and jurisdictional only where for special benefit of interested parties. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Nature of requirement for mailing of notice. —

Where county commissioners published notice of proposed location of road for three successive weeks in newspaper, failure of commissioners to cause copy of notice to be sent by registered mail to owners of lands over which highway was proposed to be laid out did not vitiate proceedings for establishment of road as against collateral attack, since phraseology of statute made provision for notice by registered mail merely directory. Cottman v. Lochner, 40 Wyo. 378, 278 P. 71,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1929).

The holding in Cottman v. Lochner, 40 Wyo. 378, 278 P. 71,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1929), that the requirement for publication is directory must be taken as far less than a blanket pronouncement that a governmental agency may, by publishing a statement of location of road in the newspaper, foreclose an uninformed landowner's right to damages without an opportunity for hearing. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Stringer, 77 Wyo. 198, 310 P.2d 730,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1957).

Mailing notice minimum compliance with section. —

Where actual notice of a condemnation proceeding is lacking, the minimum compliance with this section requires the mailing of a notice to the affected parties in all cases in which their names and whereabouts are known or may be ascertained with reasonable diligence. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Stringer, 77 Wyo. 198, 310 P.2d 730,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1957).

An oil and gas lease is “an interest in land” within the meaning of this section.

State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Stringer, 77 Wyo. 198, 310 P.2d 730,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1957).

Notice or presumption of notice as to lessee. —

Defendant in possession of land, as lessee, during all of the time eminent domain proceedings as to the land were taking place, must have had notice thereof, or at least he is presumed to have had notice thereof. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

Sufficient description of land. —

Where description of land proposed to be taken for highway named point where proposed highway begins, its termination and intervening general course, and stated that plans showing location in detail were on file in county clerk's office, description was sufficient against collateral attack by landowner who made no objection during proceeding and did not exercise right of appeal. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Title to lands proper issue in proceedings. —

Title to lands to be taken or damaged for a highway in condemnation proceedings is a proper issue in such proceedings where it is not made duty of the county to set forth names of persons whose property is proposed to be taken, but rather the right is extended generally to all persons to assert whatever claims for damages they may have by reason of the establishment of a road. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Defect in viewer's report. —

Any defect of viewer's report in not itemizing damages and benefits is not jurisdictional. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Suit to enjoin use of road is collateral attack

on establishment of road. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

And every presumption is indulged in favor of validity of proceedings

to establish road in suit to enjoin obstruction thereof. Cottman v. Lochner, 40 Wyo. 378, 278 P. 71,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1929).

Presumption as to qualifications of petitioners. —

It will be presumed on collateral attack that commissioners correctly determined qualifications of petitioners for establishment of public road. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Evidence to show that another paper was part of petition

to establish public road is admissible on collateral attack, though incidentally establishing jurisdictional fact. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Cited

in

Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

, 4 L.R.A. (n.s.) 169 (1905); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952); Ruby v. Schuett, 360 P.2d 170,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 24-3-111.
Objections and claims for damages; when filed.

If the board of the county commissioners shall determine to establish, lay out or alter any road, they shall appoint a day, not less than thirty (30) days after such determination, on or before which day all objections to the establishment, alteration or vacation of the proposed road, and claims for damages by reason thereof, shall be filed with the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 1917; C.S. 1910, § 2524; C.S. 1920, § 2996; R.S. 1931, § 52-215; C.S. 1945, § 48-315; W.S. 1957, § 24-53.

Due process. —

Where title to right-of-way for road was acquired by proceedings to locate the road, and an opportunity was given owner to present his claim for damages in manner prescribed by statute, his property was not taken without due process of law. Kelly v. Board of Comm'rs, 24 Wyo. 386, 159 P. 1086,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1916).

Recovery of damages limited to amount claimed. —

Where claim for damages was made under this section, landowner could recover no more than amount claimed, despite contention that cost of item for which damages were awarded had increased from the time claim had been filed. Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1952).

Measure of damages to lands not taken. —

The jury were correctly instructed that the measure of damage, if any, was the difference between the market value of the ranch immediately prior to the establishment of the road and the value thereof immediately after such establishment, where the only issue was the dispute as to the damage to the lands not taken. Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923).

§ 24-3-112.
Objections and claims for damages; when barred.

No objections or claims for damages shall be filed or made after the noon [12:00 p.m.] of the day fixed for filing the same, and if no objections or claims for damages are filed, on or before noon [12:00 p.m.] of the day fixed for filing the same, they shall be disregarded, and not considered, and shall be deemed to have been waived and barred.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 1919; C.S. 1910, § 2526; C.S. 1920, § 2998; R.S. 1931, § 52-217; C.S. 1945, § 48-317; W.S. 1957, § 24-54.

Constitutional provision for taking private property without compensation was not violated

by provision limiting time for presentment of claims for damages. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Commissioners cannot extend time after expiration. —

Commissioners cannot, after expiration of time for filing claims for damages, extend the time. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Claims not barred until notice given. —

The provision for the barring of damage claims does not become operative against a person who claims lands or interests therein until the required notice has been given to him or until there has been a reasonable effort to inform him that his property rights are to be affected. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Stringer, 77 Wyo. 198, 310 P.2d 730,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1957).

Absence of actual notice or notice by registered mail. —

A nonresident holding an oil and gas lease on land condemned for highway purposes was not barred from filing a claim for damages where he had no actual notice of the condemnation proceeding and where the state failed to mail a notice by registered mail to the address appearing on the recorded lease. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Stringer, 77 Wyo. 198, 310 P.2d 730,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1957).

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Cited

in

Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

, 4 L.R.A. (n.s.) 169 (1905); North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).

§ 24-3-113.
Objections and claims for damages; continuance of hearing upon filing.

If objections to the establishment, altering or vacating of the road, or if any claims for damages shall be filed, the further hearing of the application may be continued by the board until the matter can be properly disposed of.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 1920; C.S. 1910, § 2527; C.S. 1920, § 2999; R.S. 1931, § 52-218; C.S. 1945, § 48-318; W.S. 1957, § 24-55.

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1923); Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).

§ 24-3-114.
Appraisers; number; appointment; qualifications; duties generally; report.

When claims for damages are filed, at the next regular meeting or special meeting of the board of the county commissioners, or as soon thereafter as may be practicable and convenient, the said board shall appoint three (3) suitable and disinterested electors of the county as appraisers, to view the ground, on a day fixed by said board, and they shall report their doings in the matter and file their report in writing with the county clerk within thirty (30) days after the date of their appointment, fixing the amount of the damages sustained by the claimants.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 1921; C.S. 1910, § 2528; C.S. 1920, § 3000; R.S. 1931, § 52-219; C.S. 1945, § 48-319; W.S. 1957, § 24-56.

Failure to fix time for meeting of appraisers. —

While failure to fix a time for meeting of appraisers was irregularity, such failure did not render proceeding to condemn land for highway illegal or subject to collateral attack. Miller v. Hagie, 59 Wyo. 383, 140 P.2d 746,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1943).

Applied

in

HKD Homesite Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 69 Wyo. 236, 240 P.2d 885,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1952).

Cited

in

Bliss v. Board of County Comm'rs, 70 Wyo. 42, 244 P.2d 508,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1952).